Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20 of Title 27, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
State agencies may not use eminent domain for the purpose of
economic development.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15816 JL 01/02/26





Req. No. 15816 Page 1